Massachusetts, session 194th, S2878.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 3 of chapter 40 of the General Laws or of any
other general or special law to the contrary, but subject to paragraphs (a), (b) and (g) of section
16 of chapter 30B of the General Laws, the town of Tewksbury may lease the North Street
Elementary School for a term of not more than 99 years.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1